test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-jokk_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 


  Noun - jokk â-stem: # Noun 'river' - full paradigm
     jokk+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: jokk
     jokk+N+Sg+Gen+Indef: jooǥǥ
     jokk+N+Sg+Acc+Indef: jooǥǥ
     jokk+N+Sg+Ill+Indef: joʹǩǩe
     jokk+N+Sg+Loc+Indef: jooǥǥâst
     jokk+N+Sg+Com+Indef: jooǥǥin
     jokk+N+Ess+Indef: jokkân
     jokk+N+Par+Indef: jokkâd
     jokk+N+Sg+Abe+Indef: [jooǥǥtaa, jooǥǥtää]
     jokk+N+Pl+Nom+Indef: jooǥǥ
     jokk+N+Pl+Gen+Indef: jooǥǥi
     jokk+N+Pl+Acc+Indef: jooǥǥid
     jokk+N+Pl+Ill+Indef: jooǥǥid
     jokk+N+Pl+Loc+Indef: jooǥǥin
     jokk+N+Pl+Com+Indef: jooǥǥivuiʹm
     jokk+N+Pl+Abe+Indef: [jooǥǥitaa, jooǥǥitää]
     jokk+N+Der/Dim+N+Sg+Nom+Indef: jooǥǥâž
